District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.31

Severability.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 414, ch. 93, title 13, § 31
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1430.
1973 Ed., § 35-1131.